.vale/styles/RedHat/dictionaries/en_US-RedHat.aff
SET UTF-8

# Plural suffix flag
SFX S Y 6
SFX S y ies [^aeiou]y
SFX S 0 s   [aeiou]y
SFX S 0 es  [sxz]
SFX S 0 es  [sc]h
SFX S 0 s   [^sc]h
SFX S 0 s   [^sxzhy]

# Possessive suffix flag
SFX P Y 2
SFX P 0 's [^s]
SFX P 0 ' [s]
